California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(b) A veterinarian acting under this section shall make an appropriate record that includes the basis for proceeding under this section.

(c) A veterinarian who performs services pursuant to this section shall have immunity from liability pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 8659 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 571, Sec. 25.   (SB 1480)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4826.5.

Notwithstanding any other law, a licensed veterinarian, registered veterinary technician, or veterinary assistant controlled substance permitholder under the supervision of a licensed veterinarian may compound drugs for animal use pursuant to Section 530 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations and in accordance with regulations promulgated by the board. The regulations promulgated by the board shall, at a minimum, address the storage of drugs, the level and type of supervision required for compounding drugs by a registered veterinary technician or a veterinary assistant controlled substance permitholder, and the equipment necessary for the safe compounding of drugs. Any violation of the regulations adopted by the board pursuant to this section shall constitute grounds for an enforcement or disciplinary
 action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 195, Sec. 5.   (AB 1502)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4826.6.

(a) A veterinarian shall not prescribe, dispense, or administer a drug, medicine, application, or treatment of whatever nature for the prevention, cure, or relief of a wound, fracture, bodily injury, or disease of animals unless a veterinarian-client-patient relationship exists or as otherwise permitted by law, except when the animal patient is a wild animal or the owner of the animal patient is unknown. A veterinarian-client-patient relationship exists if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The client has authorized the veterinarian to assume responsibility for medical judgments regarding the health of the animal patient.

(2) The veterinarian possesses sufficient knowledge of the animal
 patient to initiate at least a general or preliminary diagnosis of the animal patient’s medical condition.

(3) The veterinarian has assumed responsibility for making medical judgments regarding the health of the animal patient and has communicated with the client a medical, treatment, diagnostic, or therapeutic plan appropriate to the circumstances.

(b) A veterinarian possesses sufficient knowledge of the animal patient for purposes of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) if the veterinarian has recently seen, or is personally acquainted with, the care of the animal patient by doing any of the following:

(1) Examining the animal patient in person.

(2) Examining the animal patient by use of synchronous audio-video communication.

(3) Making medically appropriate and timely visits to the premises on which the animal patient is kept.

(c) For purposes of paragraphs (1) and (3) of subdivision (a), the client may authorize an agent to act on the client’s behalf.

(d) Synchronous audio-video communication is not required for the delivery of veterinary medicine via telehealth after a veterinarian-client-patient relationship has been established unless the veterinarian determines that it is necessary in order to provide care consistent with prevailing veterinary medical practice.

(e) A veterinarian-client-patient relationship shall not be established solely by audio-only communication or by means of a questionnaire.

(f) Only a
 person who holds a current license to practice veterinary medicine in this state is authorized to practice veterinary medicine via telehealth on an animal patient located in this state.

(g) Before delivering veterinary medicine via telehealth, the veterinarian shall inform the client about the use and potential limitations of telehealth and obtain consent from the client to use telehealth, including acknowledgment of all of the following:

(1) The same standards of care apply to veterinary medicine services via telehealth and in-person veterinary medical services.

(2) The client has the option to choose an in-person visit from a veterinarian at any time.

(3) The client has been advised how to receive followup care or assistance in the event of an adverse
 reaction to the treatment or in the event of an inability to communicate resulting from technological or equipment failure.

(h) A veterinarian who practices veterinary medicine via telehealth shall do all of the following:

(1) Ensure that the technology, method, and equipment used to provide veterinary medicine services via telehealth comply with all current privacy protection laws.

(2) Have historical knowledge of the animal patient by obtaining and reviewing the animal patient’s relevant medical history, and, if available, medical records. If medical records exist from a previous in-person visit and are available to the client, the client may transmit those records, including any diagnostic data contained therein, to the veterinarian electronically.

(3) Employ sound professional judgment to determine whether using telehealth is an appropriate method for delivering medical advice or treatment to the animal patient and providing quality of care consistent with prevailing veterinary medical practice.

(4) Be familiar with available medical resources, including emergency resources near the animal patient’s location, be able to provide the client with a list of nearby veterinarians who may be able to see the animal patient in person upon the request of the client, and keep, maintain, and make available a copy or summary of the animal patient record, as specified in Section 4855.

(5) Provide the client with the veterinarian’s name, contact information, and license number.

(6) Secure an alternative means of contacting the client if the electronic means is
 interrupted.

(i) (1) A veterinarian shall not prescribe a drug for a duration of time that is inconsistent with the medical condition of the animal patient or the type of drug prescribed.

(2) A veterinarian who established the required veterinarian-client-patient relationship by examining the animal patient in person or by making medically appropriate and timely visits to the premises on which the animal patient is kept shall not prescribe a drug for a duration of time that is longer than one year from the date that the veterinarian examined the animal patient in person or visited the premises and prescribed the drug.

(3) Except as provided in paragraphs (4) to (8), inclusive, a veterinarian who practices veterinary medicine via telehealth may order, prescribe, or make available drugs, as
 defined in Section 11014 of the Health and Safety Code, in accordance with all relevant state and federal regulations.

(4) A veterinarian who established the required veterinarian-client-patient relationship using synchronous audio-video communication shall not prescribe a drug to the animal patient for use for a period longer than six months from the date upon which the veterinarian examined the animal patient or prescribed the drug. The veterinarian shall not issue another prescription to the animal patient for the same drug unless they have conducted another examination of the animal patient, either in person or using telehealth.

(5) A veterinarian who established the required veterinarian-client-patient relationship using synchronous audio-video communication shall not prescribe an antimicrobial drug to the animal patient for a period longer than 14 days of treatment. The
 veterinarian shall not issue any further antimicrobial drug prescription, including a refill, to treat the condition of the animal patient unless the veterinarian has conducted an in-person examination of the animal patient.

(6) The veterinarian shall not order, prescribe, or make available a controlled substance, as defined in Section 4021, or xylazine, unless the veterinarian has performed an in-person physical examination of the animal patient or made medically appropriate and timely visits to the premises where the animal patient is kept.

(7) The veterinarian shall notify the client that some prescription drugs or medications may be available at a pharmacy and, if requested, the veterinarian shall submit a prescription to a pharmacy that the client chooses.

(8) A veterinarian shall not prescribe via telehealth
 any drug or medication for use on a horse engaged in racing or training at a facility under the jurisdiction of the California Horse Racing Board pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 19400) of Division 8.

(j) As used in this section, “drug” means any controlled substance, as defined in Section 4021, or any dangerous drug, as defined in Section 4022.

(k) A veterinarian is permitted to use telehealth without establishing a veterinarian-client-patient relationship in order to provide advice in an emergency, as defined in Section 4840.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 195, Sec. 6.   (AB 1502)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4826.7.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Private animal shelter” means a not-for-profit organization that has tax-exempt status under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, whose purpose and practice is, in whole or significant part, the care of animals and placement of animals into permanent homes through adoption.

(2) “Veterinarian”
 means a California licensed veterinarian.

(b) A veterinarian may authorize a registered veterinary technician to act as an agent of the veterinarian for the purpose of establishing the veterinarian-client-patient relationship to administer preventive or prophylactic vaccines or medications for the control or eradication of apparent or anticipated internal or external parasites if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the registered
 veterinary technician administers preventive or prophylactic vaccines or medications for the control or eradication of apparent or anticipated internal or external parasites in a registered veterinary premises when the veterinarian is physically present at the registered veterinary premises.

(2) If working at a location other than a registered veterinary premises, or in a registered veterinary premises that is a public animal control agency or shelter, private animal shelter, humane society shelter, or society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, the registered veterinary technician administers preventive or prophylactic vaccines or medications for the control or eradication of apparent or anticipated internal or external parasites when the veterinarian is in the general vicinity or available by telephone
 and is quickly and easily available. At this location, the registered veterinary technician shall have equipment and drugs necessary to provide immediate emergency care at a level commensurate with the provision of preventive or prophylactic vaccines or medications for the control or eradication of apparent or anticipated internal or external parasites.

(3) The registered veterinary technician examines the animal patient and administers preventive or prophylactic vaccines or medications for the control or eradication of apparent or anticipated internal or external parasites in accordance with written protocols and procedures established by the veterinarian, which shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:

(A) Obtaining the animal patient’s history from the client in order to
 reasonably ensure that the administration of preventive or prophylactic vaccines or medications for the control or
 eradication of apparent or anticipated internal or external parasites is appropriate.

(B) Data that must be collected by physical examination of the animal patient in order to reasonably ensure that the administration of preventive or prophylactic vaccines or medications for the control or eradication of apparent or anticipated internal or external parasites is appropriate.

(C) Information in the patient history or physical examination results that would preclude the administration of preventive or prophylactic vaccines or medications for the control or eradication of apparent or anticipated internal or external parasites.

(D) Criteria that would disqualify the animal patient from receiving the preventive
 or prophylactic vaccines or medications for the control or eradication of apparent or anticipated internal or
 external parasites.

(E) Vaccination protocols for each animal species for which preventive or prophylactic vaccines are administered, that include, at a minimum, handling and administration of vaccines in accordance with manufacturer label recommendations and what to do in the event of an adverse reaction or other emergency.

(F) Preventative procedures for parasite control for each animal species for which medications for the control or eradication of apparent or anticipated internal or external parasites are being administered, which shall include, at a minimum, handling and administration of medications in accordance with manufacturer label recommendations and what to do in the event of an adverse reaction or other emergency.

(G) Documentation of all of the following animal patient information:

(i) Name or initials of the person responsible for entries.

(ii) Name, address, and phone number of the client.

(iii) Name or identity of the animal, herd, or flock.

(iv) Except for herds or flocks, age, sex, breed, species, and color of the animal.

(v) Beginning and ending dates of custody of the animal, if applicable.

(vi) A history or pertinent information as it pertains to each
 animal’s, herd’s, or flock’s medical status.

(vii) Data, including that obtained by instrumentation, from the physical examination.

(viii) Treatment and intended treatment plan, including medications, dosages, route of administration, and frequency of use.

(ix) Diagnosis or assessment before performing a treatment or procedure.

(x) If relevant, a prognosis of the animal’s condition.

(xi) All medications and treatments prescribed and dispensed, including strength, dosage, route of administration, quantity, and frequency of use.

(4) The veterinarian and the registered veterinary technician sign and date a statement containing an assumption of risk by the veterinarian for all acts of the registered veterinary technician related to examining the animal patient and administering preventive or prophylactic vaccines or medications for the control or eradication of apparent or anticipated internal or external parasites, short of willful acts of animal cruelty, gross negligence, or gross unprofessional conduct on behalf of the registered veterinary technician.

(5) The veterinarian and the registered veterinary technician sign
 and date a statement containing authorization for the registered veterinary technician to act as the agent of the veterinarian only to establish the veterinarian-client-patient relationship for purposes of administering preventive or prophylactic vaccines or medications for the control or eradication of apparent or anticipated internal or external parasites when acting in compliance with the protocols and procedures specified in paragraph (3), and only until the date the veterinarian terminates authorization for the registered veterinary technician to act as the agent of the veterinarian.

(6) (A) Before the registered veterinary technician examines or administers any preventive or prophylactic vaccines or medications for the control or eradication of apparent or anticipated internal or external parasites to the animal patient,
 the registered veterinary technician informs the client verbally or in writing that the registered veterinary technician is acting as an agent of the veterinarian for purposes of administering to the animal patient preventive or prophylactic vaccines or medications, as applicable, and provides the veterinarian’s name and license number to the client.

(B) After providing the disclosure specified in subparagraph (A), the registered veterinary technician records in the animal patient’s medical record the verbal or written authorization of the client to proceed with the registered veterinary technician’s examination of the animal patient and administration of the specified vaccine or medication.

(c) (1) Documentation relating to satisfaction of the requirements
 of paragraphs (4) and (5) of subdivision (b) shall be retained by the veterinarian for the duration of the registered veterinary technician’s work as an agent of that veterinarian and until three years from the date of the termination of the veterinarian’s relationship with the registered veterinary technician.

(2) Documentation relating to satisfaction of subparagraph (G) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) shall be retained by the veterinarian for a minimum of three years after the animal patient’s last visit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 589, Sec. 1.   (SB 602)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4826.8.

(a) An onychectomy, tendonectomy, surgical claw removal, or declaw on any feline or any procedure to otherwise alter a feline’s toes, claws, or paws to prevent or impair the normal function of the feline’s toes, claws, or paws shall be performed solely for a therapeutic purpose.

(b) For purposes of this section, “therapeutic purpose” means a medically necessary procedure to address an existing or recurring infection, disease, injury, or abnormal condition in the claws, nail bed, or toe bone, which jeopardizes the feline’s health. “Therapeutic purpose” does not include a procedure performed for a cosmetic or aesthetic purpose or to make the feline more convenient
 to keep or handle.

(c) This section shall not prohibit a veterinarian from nail trimming or applying nonsurgical scratching mitigation solutions, such as the application of a device to the tip of a claw.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 479, Sec. 2.   (AB 867)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4827.

(a) Nothing in this chapter prohibits any person from:

(1) Practicing veterinary medicine as a bona fide owner of one’s own
 animals, except for the procedures specified in Section 4826.8. This exemption applies to the following:

(A) The owner’s bona fide employees.

(B) Any person assisting the owner, provided that the practice is performed gratuitously.

(2) Lay testing of poultry by the whole blood agglutination test. For purposes of this section, “poultry” means flocks of avian species maintained for food production, including, but not limited to, chickens, turkeys, and exotic fowl.

(3) Making any determination as to the status of pregnancy, sterility, or infertility upon livestock, equine, or food animals at the time an animal is being inseminated, providing no charge is made for this determination.

(4) Administering sodium pentobarbital for euthanasia of sick, injured, homeless, or surrendered domestic pets or animals without the presence of a veterinarian when the person is
 administering the treatment in their capacity as an employee of an animal control shelter and its agencies or humane society and has received proper training in the administration of sodium pentobarbital for these purposes.

(5) Providing the following care to animals lawfully deposited with or impounded by a shelter not registered with the board pursuant to Section 4853:

(A) Administering preventative or prophylactic nonprescription vaccinations to the animal pursuant to protocols written by a veterinarian licensed in this state for the purposes of preventing the spread of communicable diseases, without the presence of a veterinarian when the person has received proper training in the administration of the nonprescription preventative or prophylactic vaccinations.

(B) Administering nonprescription medications to the animal pursuant to protocols written by a veterinarian licensed in this state, for the control or eradication of apparent or anticipated internal or external parasites, including, but not limited to, fleas, ticks, or worms, without the presence of a veterinarian when the person has received proper training in the administration of the nonprescription medications for the control or eradication of those internal or external parasites. A person’s decision to administer these medications shall not be construed to mean the person has made a diagnosis of the animal’s medical condition.

(C) Administering medications prescribed by a veterinarian licensed in the state to the animal without the presence of a veterinarian when the shelter has received a written treatment plan from the licensed veterinarian for that specific animal and has a dispensing protocol in place for the tracking of
 dispensed prescribed medications and when the person has received proper training in the administration of prescription medications.

(b) For the purposes of paragraph (5) of subdivision (a):

(1) “Proper training” means completing a training curriculum of at least four hours provided by a veterinarian licensed to practice in this state, and includes, but is not limited to, an overview of intake procedures and preventative medicine, recognizing when an animal is required to be seen by a veterinarian, prescription and nonprescription medications, humane animal restraint techniques, vaccination injection methods and procedures, and documentation.

(2) “Shelter” means a public animal control agency or shelter, society for the prevention of cruelty to animals shelter, or humane society shelter that is not registered with
 the board pursuant to Section 4853.

(c) A shelter providing care to an animal pursuant to this section that is not registered with the board pursuant to Section 4853 shall report to the board any adverse event resulting in significant impairment or death from the care provided, on a form prescribed by the board, including severe injuries, infections, and unintended reactions caused by the incorrect or inappropriate administration of a vaccine or medications.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 479, Sec. 3.5.   (AB 867)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4828.

All veterinarians actually engaged and employed as veterinarians by the state, or a county, city, corporation, firm or individual are practicing veterinary medicine and shall secure a license issued by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 60, Sec. 14.   Effective July 6, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4829.

Any license granted to any person to practice veterinary medicine, or any branch thereof, in this State issued under any preceding act relating to veterinary medicine shall remain in force until the renewal fee becomes due and thereafter so long as the holder complies with the provisions of this chapter relating to the renewal of the license and not otherwise. Notwithstanding the payment of this fee his license at any time may be suspended or revoked as provided in Article 4 of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1395.)
-------------------------------------------

4829.5.

(a) Each time a veterinarian initially prescribes, dispenses, or furnishes a dangerous drug, as defined in Section 4022, to an animal patient in an outpatient setting, the veterinarian shall offer to provide, verbally, in writing, or by email to the client, a consultation that includes the following information:

(1) The name and description of the dangerous drug.

(2) Route of administration, dosage form, dosage, duration of drug therapy, the duration of the effects of the drug, and the common severe adverse effects associated with the use of a short-acting or long-acting drug.

(3) Any special directions for proper use and storage.

(4) Actions to be taken in the event of a missed dose.

(5) If available, precautions and relevant warnings provided by the drug’s manufacturer, including common severe adverse effects of the drug.

(b) If requested, a veterinarian shall provide drug documentation, if available.

(c) A veterinarian may delegate to a registered veterinary technician or veterinary assistant the task of providing the consultation and drug documentation required by this section.

(d) It shall be noted in the medical record of the animal patient if the consultation described in this section is provided or declined by the client.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 475, Sec. 4.   (AB 1399)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4830.

(a) This chapter does not apply to:

(1) Veterinarians while serving in any armed branch of the military service of the United States or the United States Department of Agriculture while actually engaged and employed in their official capacity.

(2) Veterinarians holding a current, valid license in good standing in another state or country who provide assistance to a California-licensed veterinarian and attend on a specific case. The California-licensed veterinarian shall maintain a valid veterinarian-client-patient relationship. The veterinarian providing the assistance shall not establish a veterinarian-client-patient relationship
 with the client by attending the case or at a future time and shall not practice veterinary medicine, open an office, appoint a place to meet patients, communicate with clients who reside within the limits of this state, give orders, or have ultimate authority over the care or primary diagnosis of a patient that is located within this state.

(3) Veterinarians called into the state by a law enforcement agency or animal control agency pursuant to subdivision (b).

(4) A student of a veterinary medical program accredited by the American Veterinary Medical Association Council on Education who participates as part of the student’s formal curriculum in the diagnosis and treatment with direct supervision by a California-licensed veterinarian, or in surgery with immediate supervision by a
 California-licensed veterinarian, provided all of the following requirements are met:

(A) The clinical training site has been approved by the university where the student is enrolled.

(B) The student has prior training in diagnosis, treatment, and surgery as part of the formal curriculum.

(5) A veterinarian who is employed by the Meat and Poultry Inspection Branch of the California Department of Food and Agriculture while actually engaged and employed in the veterinarian’s official capacity. A person exempt under this paragraph shall not otherwise engage in the practice of veterinary medicine unless the person is issued a license by the board.

(6) Unlicensed
 personnel employed by the Department of Food and Agriculture or the United States Department of Agriculture when in the course of their duties they are directed by a veterinarian supervisor to conduct an examination, obtain biological specimens, apply biological tests, or administer medications or biological products as part of government disease or condition monitoring, investigation, control, or eradication activities.

(b) (1) For purposes of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), a regularly licensed veterinarian in good standing who is called from another state by a law enforcement agency or animal control agency, as defined in Section 31606 of the Food and Agricultural Code, to attend to cases that are a part of an investigation of an alleged violation of federal or state animal fighting or animal cruelty laws within
 a single geographic location shall be exempt from the licensing requirements of this chapter if the law enforcement agency or animal control agency determines that it is necessary to call the veterinarian in order for the agency or officer to conduct the investigation in a timely, efficient, and effective manner. In determining whether it is necessary to call a veterinarian from another state, consideration shall be given to the availability of veterinarians in this state to attend to these cases. An agency, department, or officer that calls a veterinarian pursuant to this subdivision shall notify the board of the investigation.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a regularly licensed veterinarian in good standing who is called from another state to attend to cases that are a part of an investigation described in paragraph
 (1) may provide veterinary medical care for animals that are affected by the investigation with a temporary shelter facility, and the temporary shelter facility shall be exempt from the registration requirement of Section 4853 if all of the following conditions are met:

(A) The temporary shelter facility is established only for the purpose of the investigation.

(B) The temporary shelter facility provides veterinary medical care, shelter, food, and water only to animals that are affected by the investigation.

(C) The temporary shelter facility complies with Section 4854.

(D) The temporary shelter facility exists for not more than 60 days, unless the law
 enforcement agency or animal control agency determines that a longer period of time is necessary to complete the investigation.

(E) Within 30 calendar days upon completion of the provision of veterinary health care services at a temporary shelter facility established pursuant to this section, the veterinarian called from another state by a law enforcement agency or animal control agency to attend to a case shall file a report with the board. The report shall contain the date, place, type, and general description of the care provided, along with a listing of the veterinary health care practitioners who participated in providing that care.

(c) For purposes of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), the board may inspect temporary facilities established pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 631, Sec. 5.   (AB 1535)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

4830.5.

(a) If a licensee under this chapter has reasonable cause to believe that a dog has been injured or killed through participation in a staged animal fight, as prescribed in Section 597b of the Penal Code, it is the duty of the licensee to promptly report that fact to the appropriate law enforcement authorities of the county, city, or city and county in which the fight occurred.

(b) A licensee shall not incur any civil liability as a result of making any report pursuant to this section or as a result of making any report of a violation of Section 596, subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 597, or Section 597b, former Section 597f, Section 597g, 597n, 597.1, or 597.5 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 256, Sec. 1.   (SB 781)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4830.7.

Whenever any licensee under this chapter has reasonable cause to believe an animal under its care has been a victim of animal abuse or cruelty, as prescribed in Section 597 of the Penal Code, it shall be the duty of the licensee to promptly report it to the appropriate law enforcement authorities of the county, city, or city and county in which it occurred. No licensee shall incur any civil liability as a result of making any report pursuant to this section or as a result of making any report of a violation of subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) of Section 597 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 467, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

4830.8.

(a) An attending or on-call veterinarian at a rodeo event shall, pursuant to Section 596.7 of the Penal Code, report to the board any animal injury at the event requiring veterinary treatment within 48 hours of the conclusion of the rodeo.

(b) A veterinarian, other than a veterinarian identified in subdivision (a), shall report to the board within seven days of rendering treatment to an animal for an injury that the veterinarian knows occurred at a rodeo event.

(c) A report submitted pursuant to this section shall include the title, location, and date of the rodeo event, the name of the attending veterinarian at the event, the name of the
 reporting veterinarian, the type of animal, and a brief description of the injury suffered by the animal. The board shall post a form on its Internet Web site to be used by veterinarians for purposes of submitting this report.

(d) For purposes of this section, “rodeo” has the same meaning set forth in Section 596.7 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 538, Sec. 10.   (AB 1980)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4831.

Any person, who violates or aids or abets in violating any of the provisions of this chapter, is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500), nor more than two thousand dollars ($2,000), or by imprisonment in a county jail for not less than 30 days nor more than one year, or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 642, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Registered Veterinary Technicians [4836. - 4845.]

4836.

(a) The board shall adopt regulations establishing animal health care tasks and an appropriate degree of supervision required for those tasks that may be performed only by a registered veterinary technician or a licensed veterinarian.

(b) The board also may adopt regulations establishing animal health care tasks that may be performed by a veterinary assistant as well as by a registered veterinary technician or a licensed veterinarian. The board shall establish an appropriate degree of supervision by a registered veterinary technician or a licensed veterinarian over a veterinary assistant for any tasks established under this subdivision and the degree
 of supervision for any of those tasks shall be higher than, or equal to, the degree of supervision required when a registered veterinary technician performs the task.

(c) The board may adopt regulations, as needed, to define subdivision (c) of Section 4840, including, but not limited to, procedures for citations and fines, in accordance with Section 125.9.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 239, Sec. 4.   (AB 1839)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4836.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a registered veterinary technician or a veterinary assistant may administer a drug, including, but not limited to, a drug that is a controlled substance, under the direct or indirect supervision of a licensed veterinarian when done pursuant to the order, control, and full professional responsibility of a licensed veterinarian. However, no person, other than a licensed veterinarian, may induce anesthesia unless authorized by regulation of the California Veterinary Medical Board.

(b) A veterinary assistant may obtain or administer a controlled substance pursuant to the order, control, and full professional responsibility of a licensed veterinarian,
 only if they meet both of the following conditions:

(1) Is designated by a licensed veterinarian to obtain or administer controlled substances.

(2) Holds a valid veterinary assistant controlled substance permit issued pursuant to Section 4836.2.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), if the California Veterinary Medical Board, in consultation with the California State Board of Pharmacy, identifies a dangerous drug, as defined in Section 4022, as a drug that has an established pattern of being diverted, the California Veterinary Medical Board may restrict access to that drug by veterinary assistants.

(d) For purposes of this section, the following definitions
 apply:

(1) “Controlled substance” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 11007 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) “Direct supervision” has the same meaning as that term is defined in subdivision (e) of Section 2034 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations.

(3) “Drug” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 11014 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) “Indirect supervision” has the same meaning as that term is defined in subdivision (f) of Section 2034 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations.

(e) This section shall become operative on the date
 Section 4836.2 becomes operative.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 60.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4836.2.

(a) To obtain a veterinary assistant controlled substance permit in California, an individual shall satisfy the following requirements:

(1) Complete and submit an application furnished by the board.

(2) Pay the applicable fees specified in Section 4905.

(3) Pursuant to Section 144, submit a full set of fingerprints for the purpose of conducting a criminal history record check and undergoing a state and federal criminal offender record information search conducted through the Department of Justice, pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code. The Department of Justice shall provide a state or federal
 response to the board pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(b) The applicant shall disclose each state, Canadian province, or United States territory in which the applicant currently holds or has ever held a license, registration, certificate, or permit to practice veterinary medicine. License verification, including any disciplinary or enforcement history, shall be confirmed through electronic means or direct submission from each state, Canadian province, or United States territory in which the applicant has identified that the applicant holds or has ever held a license to practice veterinary medicine.

(c) A veterinary assistant controlled substance permit application shall be subject to denial pursuant to Sections 480 and 4883.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 195, Sec. 9.   (AB 1502)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4836.4.

(a) Every person who has been issued a veterinary assistant controlled substance permit by the board pursuant to Section 4836.2 who changes his or her mailing or employer address shall notify the board of his or her new mailing or employer address within 30 days of the change. The board shall not renew the permit of any person who fails to comply with this section unless the person pays the penalty fee prescribed in Section 4842.5. An applicant for the renewal of a permit shall specify in his or her application whether he or she has changed his or her mailing or employer address and the board may accept that statement as evidence of the fact.

(b) This section shall become operative on the date Section
 4836.2 becomes operative.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 515, Sec. 28.   (SB 304)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Pursuant to subd. (e), this section became operative on July 1, 2015, the operative date of Section 4836.2.   Note: Section 4836.2 first became operative on July 1, 2015, in its form as amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 395.)
-------------------------------------------

4836.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a registered veterinary technician or a veterinary assistant may collect blood from an animal for the purpose of transferring or selling the blood and blood component products to a licensed veterinarian at a registered premises, under the direct or indirect supervision of a licensed veterinarian when done pursuant to the order, control, and full professional responsibility of a licensed veterinarian.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
